Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1035
Abstract of votes; failure to receive; delivery required; powers of Secretary of State.

(1) If the Secretary of State has not received the abstract of votes from any county by the deadlines specified in section 32-1034, the Secretary of State may:

(a) Require the election commissioner or county clerk of such county to send the abstract of votes via overnight delivery with a tracking number provided or next day hand delivery at such county's expense; or

(b) Send a messenger to the election commissioner or county clerk of such county at the expense of such county. The election commissioner or county clerk shall furnish the messenger with the abstract of votes or, if the abstract has been sent, with a copy of the abstract, and the messenger shall return the abstract to the Secretary of State without delay.

(2) If the abstract of votes was delayed by reason of the fault or neglect of the election commissioner or county clerk, he or she shall be responsible to the county for the cost of the messenger.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 329;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 36.
April 16, 2026